District of Columbia statutes.
50-1403.03

Suspension of minor’s motor vehicle operator’s permit for alcohol violation.

(a)

The Mayor shall suspend the motor vehicle operator’s permit of a person under 21 years of age convicted of violating, or adjudicated in violation of § 25-130. The suspension shall be for the duration required by § 25-130. A copy of the conviction or adjudication shall be forwarded to the Mayor by the court or the administrative body authorized to adjudicate violations under Chapter 1 of Title 25.

(b)

Any person found guilty of operating a motor vehicle in the District during the period for which the person’s license or privilege is suspended, shall, for each offense, be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, imprisoned for not more than 180 days, or both.

Mar. 3, 1925, ch. 443, § 13b
as added May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 4, 41 DCR 1658
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 268(d), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 40-302.2.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000” in (b).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 268(d) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Section 25-130 and Chapter 1 of Title 25, referred to in this section, are part and all, respectively, of Title 25, D.C. Official Code, which title was amended and enacted by D.C. Law 13-298, effective May 3, 2001. For disposition of the subject matter of former Title 25, see the Disposition Table preceding § 25-101.
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.